Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-25] Conduct of hearing in child
protective proceedings. (a) The court shall hear child protective
proceedings without a jury at a hearing separate from those for adults.

(b) The general public shall be excluded from child
protective proceedings. Only parties found by the court to have a direct
interest in the case shall be admitted to the hearing.

(c) The court has discretion to exclude the
child from the hearing at any time.

(d) If a party is without counsel or a
guardian ad litem, the court shall inform the party of the right to be
represented by counsel and the right to appeal. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next